District of Columbia statutes.
8-1004

Repealed

Solid waste management policy for the District.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-226, § 5, 36 DCR 595
Sept. 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-178, § 3(b), 41 DCR 5205
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(g), 61 DCR 9971
1981 Ed., § 6-3404.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of District of Columbia Solid Waste Management and Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988 Temporary Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-263, March 27, 1993, law notification 40 DCR 2333).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of District of Columbia Solid Waste Management and Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988 Temporary Amendment Act of 1993 (D.C. Law 10-86, March 19, 1994, law notification 41 DCR 1636).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the District of Columbia Solid Waste Management and Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988 Emergency Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Act 9-346, December 22, 1992, 40 DCR 141).
For temporary amendments of section, see § 2(a) of the District of Columbia Solid Waste Management and Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988 Emergency Amendment Act of 1993 (D.C. Act 10-147, November 4, 1993, 40 DCR 8091) and § 2(a) of the District of Columbia Solid Waste Management and Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988 Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-185, February 2, 1994, 41 DCR 627).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 313(a) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, November 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 313(a) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).

For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.

D.C. Law 20-271 would have deleted “the Environmental Planning Commission established pursuant to § 3-1001” in (c); however, this section had previously been repealed by D.C. Law 20-154.

Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-226, the “D.C. Solid Waste Management & Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988”, see Mayor’s Order 89-160, July 20, 1989.